District of Columbia statutes.
34-1257.04

Construction of facility.

(a)

A cable operator shall complete construction of the cable system, and offer and deliver cable service in full compliance with this chapter and the franchise agreement.

(b)

A cable operator shall use existing poles, conduits, and other facilities whenever possible, and shall not construct or install any new, different, or additional poles, conduits, or other facilities without the approval of the District. No location of any pole or wire-holding structure of a cable operator shall be a vested interest, and poles or structures shall be removed or modified by the cable operator at its own expense whenever the District determines that public convenience would be enhanced thereby.

(c)

All transmission lines, equipment, and structures shall be so installed and located as to cause minimum interference with the rights, appearance, and reasonable convenience of property owners who adjoin on any street and at all times shall be kept and maintained in a safe, adequate, substantial condition, and in good order and repair. The cable operator shall at all times employ ordinary care and shall install and maintain in use commonly accepted methods and devices for preventing failures and accidents that are likely to cause damage, injuries, or nuisances to the public. Any pole or other fixture placed in a public right-of-way by the cable operator shall be placed in a manner that does not interfere with the usual travel on the public right-of-way.

(d)

A cable operator shall remove, replace, or modify the installation of any of its facilities as may be deemed necessary by the District to meet its proper responsibilities. Costs necessary to repair or refinish public rights-of-ways shall be borne by the cable operator.

(e)

Wherever an electrical and telephone utility wiring is located underground within conduits, either at the time of initial construction or subsequent thereto, and there is adequate capacity in the existing conduits for television cable, the cable shall be located underground within the existing conduits. If there is not adequate capacity in the existing underground conduits, the District’s transportation agency shall determine whether cable wiring should be located underground or overhead. Nothing in this section shall be construed to supersede any provision of existing laws or regulations with respect to prohibition of the installation of overhead wiring in certain areas of the District.

(f)

Excavation work performed by a cable operator in any public rights-of-way shall be subject to all applicable laws, rules, and regulations of the District. A cable operator shall, at its own expense and in a manner approved by the District, restore to District standards and specifications, any damage or disturbance caused to public rights-of-way as a result of its operations or construction of its facilities on its behalf, and shall guarantee the restoration until the time a permanent restoration is made. The District shall perform permanent restoration, and the costs associated therewith shall be billed to the cable operator for the full width of the permanent improvement. The cable operator shall place a deposit with the District in an amount sufficient to cover the projected costs to be incurred by the District for the permanent restoration of any excavation, damage, or disturbance of the public rights-of-way.

(g)

Whenever, in the case of fire or other disaster, it becomes necessary, in the judgment of the Office, the Fire Chief, or the Chief of the Metropolitan Police Department to remove or damage any of a cable operator’s facilities, no charge shall be made by the cable operator against the District for restoration and repair.

(h)

At the request of any person holding a valid permit issued by the District to remove a building, and upon at least 10 days notice, the cable operator shall temporarily raise, lower, or cut its wires as may be necessary to facilitate the removal. The permit holder shall pay the direct expense of the temporary changes, including standby time, and the cable operator shall have the authority to require payment in advance.

(i)

A cable operator may trim trees on public property at its own expense if necessary to protect its wires and facilities, subject to the permission, supervision, and direction of the District. Trimming of trees on private property shall require written consent of the property owner.

(j)

A cable operator shall not be required to obtain or pay for a permit in order to connect a drop line from a trunk or feeder cable to the premises of a subscriber or in order to install, maintain, or repair cable television equipment and facilities on the premises of a subscriber.

History

Aug. 21, 1982, D.C. Law 4-142, § 704
as added Oct. 9, 2002, D.C. Law 14-193, § 2(b), 49 DCR 7334